Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-6] Interagency group. (a) The
department shall establish an interagency group comprised of those agencies
whose permitting functions are not transferred by section 196D-10 to the
department for the purposes of the project and which have jurisdiction over any
aspect of the project. Each of these agencies shall designate an appropriate
representative to serve on the interagency group as part of the
representative's official responsibilities. The interagency group shall
perform liaison and assisting functions as required by this chapter and the
department. The department shall invite and encourage the appropriate federal
agencies having jurisdiction over any aspect of the project to participate in
the interagency group.

(b) The department and agencies shall
cooperate with the federal agencies to the fullest extent possible to minimize
duplication between and, where possible, promote consolidation of federal and
state requirements. To the fullest extent possible, this cooperation shall
include, among other things, joint environmental impact statements with
concurrent public review and processing at both levels of government. Where
federal law has requirements that are in addition to but not in conflict with
state law requirements, the department and the agencies shall cooperate to the
fullest extent possible in fulfilling their requirements so that all documents
shall comply with all applicable laws.

(c) If the legislature establishes any public
corporation or authority for the purposes of the project, then upon its
establishment, the public corporation or authority shall be a member of the
interagency group. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next